Maine, session 132, LD1988.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Transfer from Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital to
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Departments and
Agencies - Statewide program, General Fund account. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller may transfer up to $2,500,000 from
the balance available in the Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital to the Departments
Page 1 - 132LR2556(02)

and Agencies - Statewide program, General Fund account within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services to address funding needs related to layoff
obligations for state employees affected by federal funding disruptions that are not
otherwise directly chargeable to those federal funding sources.
Sec. 2. Transfer to Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Departments and Agencies - Statewide program, General Fund account;
special account funding. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State
Controller may authorize the transfer of Personal Services expenditures to address funding
needs related to layoff obligations for state employees affected by federal funding
disruptions that are not otherwise directly chargeable to those federal funding sources from
any federal fund account to the Departments and Agencies - Statewide program, General
Fund account within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
Expenditures may be transferred in circumstances in which federal funding has been
appropriated or awarded and has been unexpectedly removed, to help cover the 10-day
notice period that is contractually required when a state employee is laid off and to cover
shortfalls in an agency’s unemployment fund due to these unexpected layoffs.
Sec. 3. Transfer to Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller on or before
June 30, 2026 shall transfer the unobligated balance from the Departments and Agencies -
Statewide program, General Fund account within the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services to the Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2556(02)